Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-236
Pounds; erection; keepers.

A city of the first class may provide for the erection of all necessary pens, pounds, and buildings for the use of the city, within the city limits or within its extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction, appoint and compensate keepers thereof, and establish and enforce rules governing the same.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 48, XLII, p. 257;

R.S.1913, § 4852;

C.S.1922, § 4020;

C.S.1929, § 16-237;

R.S.1943, § 16-236;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 37.